Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 8. Appeals and Review

§ 4601.
Appeals in foreclosure actions.

When a judgment is for the foreclosure of a mortgage, permission of the court shall be required for review.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 66;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 129, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 4602-4613.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.